Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.942

Fire service training—Fees and fee schedules.

The Washington state patrol may: (1) Impose and collect fees for fire service training; and (2) establish and set fee schedules for fire service training.

[ 1995 c 369 s 20; 1986 c 266 s 60. Formerly RCW 43.63A.360.]

NOTES:

Application—Effective date—1995 c 369: See notes following RCW 43.43.930.

Severability—1986 c 266: See note following RCW 38.52.005.